src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! !!!Noun inflection
!! ----

!! Hill Mari nouns inflect in cases.
LEXICON NTag
  N_ ;

! SNM: ensure there is a space before the jspwiki markup __ when the preceding
! character (ie last of lexicon name) is also an _ char - otherwise one gets a
! jspwiki syntax error.
LEXICON N_  !!≈ * __@CODE@ __
 +WORK: K ;

!! !!Substandard

LEXICON N_KOL_SUB !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Err/Orth: N_KOL ;

LEXICON N_TYERVYE_SUB !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Err/Orth: N_TYERVYE ;

!! !!Standard

LEXICON N_KOL !!= @CODE@ кол:кол
!! Back harmony
  N_KOL-SG ;
  N_KOL-PL ;
LEXICON N_KOL-SG
 :%{back%} NMN_KOL-SG ;
LEXICON N_KOL-PL
 :%{back%} NMN_KOL-PL ;

LEXICON N_MOER !!= @CODE@ мӧр:мӧр
!! Front harmony
  N_MOER-SG ;
  N_MOER-PL ;
LEXICON N_MOER-SG
 :%{front%} NMN_MOER-SG ;
LEXICON N_MOER-PL
 :%{front%} NMN_MOER-PL ;

LEXICON N_MARY !!≈ * __@CODE@__ мары:мары
!! The stem vowel "е" is found with possessor indices and the lative
!! Back harmony
  N_MARY-SG ;
  N_MARY-PL ;
LEXICON N_MARY-SG
 :%{back%} NMN_MARY-SG ;
LEXICON N_MARY-PL
 :%{back%} NMN_MARY-PL ;

LEXICON N_TYERVYE !!≈ * __@CODE@__ тӹрвӹ:тӹрвӹ
!! The stem vowel "е" is found with possessor indices and the lative
!! Front harmony
  N_TYERVYE-SG ;
  N_TYERVYE-PL ;
LEXICON N_TYERVYE-SG
 :%{front%} NMN_TYERVYE-SG ;
LEXICON N_TYERVYE-PL
 :%{front%} NMN_TYERVYE-PL ;

LEXICON N_KARTA_SUB
 +Err/Orth: N_KARTA ;

LEXICON N_KARTA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ карта:карта
!! а is specific to the +Sg+Nom, elsewhere ы or ӹ
!! Back harmony
  N_KARTA-SG ;
  N_KARTA-PL ;
LEXICON N_KARTA-SG
 :%{back%} NMN_KARTA-SG ;
LEXICON N_KARTA-PL
 :%{back%} NMN_KARTA-PL ;

LEXICON N_BIRZHA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ биржа:биржа
!! а is specific to the +Sg+Nom, elsewhere  ӹ
!! Front harmony
  N_BIRZHA-SG ;
  N_BIRZHA-PL ;
LEXICON N_BIRZHA-SG
 :%{front%} NMN_BIRZHA-SG ;
LEXICON N_BIRZHA-PL
 :%{front%} NMN_BIRZHA-PL ;

LEXICON N_VAREN1E !!≈ * __@CODE@__ варенье:варенье
!! е is specific to the +Sg+Nom, elsewhere  ӹ
!! Front harmony
  N_VAREN1E-SG ;
  N_VAREN1E-PL ;
LEXICON N_VAREN1E-SG
 :%{front%} NMN_VAREN1E-SG ;
LEXICON N_VAREN1E-PL
 :%{front%} NMN_VAREN1E-PL ;

LEXICON N_POCHTA !!= @CODE@  почта:почта
        :%{back%} NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-SG_BACK   ;
        :%{back%} NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-PL_MUTUAL ;
        :%{back%} NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-SG_BACK     ; !!!!
        :%{back%} NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-PL_BACK     ;
 +Sg+Nom:%{back%} K                                ;

LEXICON N_OLMA_SUB
 +Err/Orth: N_OLMA ;
LEXICON N_OLMA !!= @CODE@  олма:олма
!! Back harmony
  N_OLMA-SG ;
  N_OLMA-PL ;
LEXICON N_OLMA-SG
 :%{back%} NMN_OLMA-SG ;
LEXICON N_OLMA-PL
 :%{back%} NMN_OLMA-PL ;

LEXICON N_AEZAE !!= @CODE@  ӓзӓ:ӓзӓ
!! Front harmony
  N_AEZAE-SG ;
  N_AEZAE-PL ;
LEXICON N_AEZAE-SG
 :%{front%} NMN_AEZAE-SG ;
LEXICON N_AEZAE-PL
 :%{front%} NMN_AEZAE-PL ;

LEXICON N_PECHEN1E !!= @CODE@  печенье:печенье
!! Front harmony
  N_PECHEN1E-SG ;
  N_PECHEN1E-PL ;
LEXICON N_PECHEN1E-SG
 :%{front%} NMN_PECHEN1E-SG ;
LEXICON N_PECHEN1E-PL
 :%{front%} NMN_PECHEN1E-PL ;

!!
LEXICON NMN_KOL !!= @CODE@ кол:кол
!! Back harmony
  NMN_KOL-SG ;
  NMN_KOL-PL ;
LEXICON NMN_KOL-SG
 +Sg+Nom: K                              ;
          NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-SG_BACK ;
          NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-SG_BACK   ;

LEXICON NMN_KOL-PL
  NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-PL_MUTUAL ;
  NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-PL_BACK     ;

LEXICON NMN_MOER !!= @CODE@ мӧр:мӧр
!! Front harmony
  NMN_MOER-SG ;
  NMN_MOER-PL ;
LEXICON NMN_MOER-SG
 +Sg+Nom: K                               ;
          NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-SG_FRONT ;
          NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-SG_FRONT   ;

LEXICON NMN_MOER-PL
  NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-PL_MUTUAL ;
  NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-PL_FRONT    ;

LEXICON NMN_MARY !!≈ * __@CODE@__ мары:мары
!! The stem vowel "е" is found with possessor indices and the lative
!! Back harmony
  NMN_MARY-SG ;
  NMN_MARY-PL ;
LEXICON NMN_MARY-SG
 +Sg+Nom: K                              ;
          NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-SG_BACK ;
          NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-SG_BACK   ;

LEXICON NMN_MARY-PL
            NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-PL_MUTUAL      ;
            NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-PL_BACK          ;
! +PxSg1:эм PL-ABEACCCOMDATGENILLINELATNOM_MUTUAL ;

LEXICON NMN_TYERVYE !!≈ * __@CODE@__ тӹрвӹ:тӹрвӹ
!! The stem vowel "е" is found with possessor indices and the lative
!! Front harmony
  NMN_TYERVYE-SG ;
  NMN_TYERVYE-PL ;
LEXICON NMN_TYERVYE-SG
 +Sg+Nom: K                               ;
          NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-SG_FRONT ;
          NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-SG_FRONT   ;

LEXICON NMN_TYERVYE-PL
            NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-PL_MUTUAL      ;
            NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-PL_FRONT         ;
! +PxSg1:эм PL-ABEACCCOMDATGENILLINELATNOM_MUTUAL ;

LEXICON NMN_KARTA	 !!≈ * __@CODE@__ карта:карта
!! Back а/ы
!! а is specific to the +Sg+Nom, elsewhere ы
  NMN_KARTA-SG ;
  NMN_KARTA-PL ;
LEXICON NMN_KARTA-SG
 +Sg+Nom:    K                              ;
        :%>ы NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-SG_BACK ;
        :%>ы NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-SG_BACK   ;

LEXICON NMN_KARTA-PL
 :%>ы NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-PL_MUTUAL ;
 :%>ы NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-PL_BACK     ;

LEXICON NMN_BIRZHA	 !!≈ * __@CODE@__ биржа:биржа
!! Front а/ӹ
!! а is specific to the +Sg+Nom, elsewhere ӹ
  NMN_BIRZHA-SG ;
  NMN_BIRZHA-PL ;
LEXICON NMN_BIRZHA-SG
  +Sg+Nom:       K                               ;
         :%>ӹ    NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-SG_FRONT ;
!        :%^А2ЫӸ NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-SG_FRONT ;
         :%>ӹ    NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-SG_FRONT   ;
!        :%^А2ЫӸ NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-SG_FRONT   ;

LEXICON NMN_BIRZHA-PL
 :%>ӹ NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-PL_MUTUAL ; !!= * __@CODE@__ %>влӓ
 :%>ӹ NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-PL_FRONT    ;

LEXICON NMN_VAREN1E	 !!≈ * __@CODE@__ варенье:варенье
!! Front е/ӹ
!! е is specific to the +Sg+Nom, elsewhere ӹ
  NMN_VAREN1E-SG ;
  NMN_VAREN1E-PL ;
LEXICON NMN_VAREN1E-SG
  +Sg+Nom:       K                               ;
         :%>ӹ    NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-SG_FRONT ;
!        :%^А2ЫӸ NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-SG_FRONT ;
         :%>ӹ    NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-SG_FRONT   ;
!        :%^А2ЫӸ NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-SG_FRONT   ;

LEXICON NMN_VAREN1E-PL
 :%>ӹ NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-PL_MUTUAL ; !!= * __@CODE@__ %>влӓ
 :%>ӹ NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-PL_FRONT    ;

LEXICON NMN_OLMA !!= @CODE@  олма:олма
!! Back harmony
  NMN_OLMA-SG ;
  NMN_OLMA-PL ;
LEXICON NMN_OLMA-SG
        +Sg+Nom:                    K                              ;
                                    NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-SG_BACK ;
                                    NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-SG_BACK   ;
! +PxSg1+Sg+Nom:эм                  K                              ;
! +PxSg2+Sg+Nom:ет                  K                              ;
! +Sg+Lat+PxSg3:%>еш%{ыӹØ%}ж%{ыӹØ%} K                              ;

LEXICON NMN_OLMA-PL
                      NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-PL_MUTUAL ;
                      NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-PL_BACK     ;

! +PxSg1+Pl+Nom:эмвлӓ K                                ;
! +PxSg1+Pl+Nom:мвлӓ  K                                ;
! +Pl+PxSg1+Nom:влӓэм K                                ;
! +PxSg2+Pl+Nom:етвлӓ K                                ;
! +PxSg2+Pl+Nom:твлӓ  K                                ;
! +Pl+Nom+PxSg2:влӓэт K                                ;

LEXICON NMN_AEZAE !!= @CODE@  ӓзӓ:ӓзӓ
!! Front harmony
  NMN_AEZAE-SG ;
  NMN_AEZAE-PL ;
LEXICON NMN_AEZAE-SG
        +Sg+Nom:                    K                               ;
                                    NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-SG_FRONT ;
                                    NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-SG_FRONT   ;
! +PxSg1+Sg+Nom:эм                  K                               ;
! +PxSg2+Sg+Nom:ет                  K                               ;
! +Sg+Lat+PxSg3:%>еш%{ыӹØ%}ж%{ыӹØ%} K                               ;
